Washington statutes.
RCW 41.58.100

Legislative commission—Report—Duties to transfer to commission.

(1)(a) There is established a legislative commission (hereafter called "the legislative commission") exclusively for the purpose of certification of bargaining representatives, adjusting and settling complaints, grievances, and disputes arising out of employer-employee relations, and otherwise carrying out the duties required of the commission under chapter 44.90 RCW.

(b) The legislative commission shall consist of three members who shall be appointed as follows:

(i) One member shall be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives;

(ii) One member shall be appointed by the president of the senate;

(iii) By mutual consent, the two appointed members shall appoint the third member who shall be the chair of the legislative commission.

(c) All appointments must be made by September 30, 2024. The members of the legislative commission, and any person appointed to fill a vacancy, are appointed for the entire term until the legislative commission expires under subsection (9) of this section.

(d) Until all the members of the legislative commission are appointed, the duties required of the legislative commission under chapter 44.90 RCW shall be carried out by the commission created under RCW 41.58.010(1).

(2) The commission may delegate to the executive director authority with respect to, but not limited to, representation proceedings, unfair labor practice proceedings, mediation, and, if applicable, arbitration of disputes concerning the interpretation or application of a collective bargaining agreement. Such delegation shall not eliminate a party's right of appeal to the legislative commission.

(3) Unless specifically provided, the legislative commission shall not be considered part of the commission created under RCW 41.58.010(1). The powers and duties granted in this chapter to the commission created under RCW 41.58.010(1) do not apply to the legislative commission, unless specifically provided.

(4) A member of the legislative commission may be removed by the speaker of the house of representatives and the president of the senate acting jointly, upon notice and hearing, for neglect of duty or malfeasance in office, but for no other cause.

(5) In making their appointments, the speaker of the house of representatives and the president of the senate shall be cognizant of the desirability of appointing a person who is knowledgeable in the area of labor relations and of the legislature.

(6) Members of the legislative commission are not eligible for state retirement under chapter 41.40 RCW by virtue of the member's service as a commissioner.

(7) The compensation and travel reimbursement provision under RCW 41.58.015(1) shall apply to members of the legislative commission.

(8) The legislative commission shall at the close of each fiscal year make a report in writing to the legislature stating the cases it has heard and decisions it has rendered.

(9)(a) The legislative commission expires December 31, 2027.

(b) After December 31, 2027, the duties required of the legislative commission under chapter 44.90 RCW shall be carried out by the commission created under RCW 41.58.010(1).

[ 2024 c 333 s 17.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2024 c 333: See note following RCW 44.90.025.